Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 3

Serums [Repealed]

44-2-301, 44-2-302. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§44-2-301,44-2-302 (Acts 1917, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; Shan. §§ 6800a13, 6800a14; Code 1932, §§ 11272, 11273; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-501, 44-502; T.C.A., §§44-4-101,44-4-102; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning animal serums, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 3.